Connecticut, session 2026, HB05280.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 31-225a of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(c) (1) (A) Any week for which the employer has compensated the
claimant in the form of wages in lieu of notice, dismissal payments or
any similar payment for loss of wages shall be considered a week of
employment for the purpose of determining employer chargeability.
(B) No benefits shall be charged to any employer who paid wages of
five hundred dollars or less to the claimant in his or her base period.
(C) No dependency allowance paid to a claimant shall be charged to
any employer.
sHB5280 / File No. 109 1

sHB5280 File No. 109
(D) In the event of a natural disaster declared by the President of the
United States, no benefits paid on the basis of total or partial
unemployment that is the result of physical damage to a place of
employment caused by severe weather conditions including, but not
limited to, hurricanes, snow storms, ice storms or flooding, or fire except
where caused by the employer, shall be charged to any employer.
(E) If the administrator finds that (i) an individual's most recent
separation from a base period employer occurred under conditions that
would result in disqualification by reason of subdivision (2), (6) or (9) of
subsection (a) of section 31-236, or (ii) an individual was discharged for
violating an employer's drug testing policy, provided the policy has
been adopted and applied consistent with sections 31-51t to 31-51aa,
inclusive, section 14-261b and any applicable federal law, no benefits
paid thereafter to such individual with respect to any week of
unemployment that is based upon wages paid by such employer with
respect to employment prior to such separation shall be charged to such
employer's account, provided such employer shall have filed a notice
with the administrator within the time allowed for appeal in section 31-
241.
(F) No base period employer's account shall be charged with respect
to benefits paid to a claimant if such employer continues to employ such
claimant at the time the employer's account would otherwise have been
charged to the same extent that he or she employed him or her during
the individual's base period, provided the employer shall notify the
administrator within the time allowed for appeal in section 31-241.
(G) If a claimant has failed to accept suitable employment under the
provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 31-236 and the
disqualification has been imposed, the account of the employer who
makes an offer of employment to a claimant who was a former
employee shall not be charged with any benefit payments made to such
claimant after such initial offer of reemployment until such time as such
claimant resumes employment with such employer, provided such
employer shall make application therefor in a form acceptable to the
sHB5280 / File No. 109 2

sHB5280 File No. 109
administrator. The administrator shall notify such employer whether or
not his or her application is granted. Any decision of the administrator
denying suspension of charges as herein provided may be appealed
within the time allowed for appeal in section 31-241.
(H) Fifty per cent of benefits paid to a claimant under the federal-state
extended duration unemployment benefits program established by the
federal Employment Security Act shall be charged to the experience
accounts of the claimant's base period employers in the same manner as
the regular benefits paid for such benefit year.
(I) No base period employer's account shall be charged with respect
to benefits paid to a claimant who voluntarily left suitable work with
such employer (i) to care for a seriously ill spouse, parent or child, or (ii)
due to the discontinuance of the transportation used by the claimant to
get to and from work, as provided in subparagraphs (A)(ii) and (A)(iii)
of subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 31-236.
(J) No base period employer's account shall be charged with respect
to benefits paid to a claimant who has been discharged or suspended
because the claimant has been disqualified from performing the work
for which he or she was hired due to the loss of such claimant's operator
license as a result of a drug or alcohol test or testing program conducted
in accordance with section 14-44k, 14-227a or 14-227b while the claimant
was off duty.
(K) No base period employer's account shall be charged with respect
to benefits paid to a claimant whose separation from employment is
attributable to the return of an individual who was absent from work
due to a bona fide leave taken pursuant to sections 31-49f to 31-49t,
inclusive, or 31-51kk to 31-51qq, inclusive.
(L) On and after January 1, 2027, no base period employer's account
shall be charged with respect to benefits paid to a claimant through the
voluntary shared work unemployment compensation program,
established pursuant to section 31-274j, if a claim for benefits is filed in
a week in which the state is in an extended benefit period or high
sHB5280 / File No. 109 3

sHB5280 File No. 109
unemployment period, pursuant to sections 31-232b to 31-232g,
inclusive. Such noncharge shall continue until the United States
Secretary of Labor has notified the Labor Commissioner that such
extended benefit period or high unemployment period has been
triggered off.
(2) All benefits paid that are not charged to any employer shall be
pooled.
(3) The noncharging provisions of this chapter, except subparagraphs
(D), (F) and (K) of subdivision (1) of this subsection, shall not apply to
reimbursing employers.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 31-225a(c)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
Subparagraph (L) was moved into Subdivision (1) for proper form.
LAB Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5280 / File No. 109 4

sHB5280 File No. 109
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Labor Dept. UITF - Potential See Below See Below
Savings
Note: UITF=Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill exempts benefits paid through the voluntary shared work
program1 from being charged to an employer’s experience account for
claims filed during weeks in which the state is in an extended benefit or
high unemployment period, which results in potential savings to the
Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund.
To the extent the change encourages greater employer participation
in the shared work program, the bill may avoid costs to the trust fund if
shared work arrangements reduce layoffs and related payments of full
benefits. Furthermore, since paid benefits would not be charged to
certain individual employers’ experience accounts under the bill, they
would be “pooled” or shared among all taxable employers.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to increases in the shared work program
participation and employee's benefit amounts.
The voluntary shared work unemployment compensation program helps employers
avoid layoffs during downturns by allowing reduced employee hours and wages,
while employees receive partial unemployment benefits for lost hours.
sHB5280 / File No. 109 5

sHB5280 File No. 109
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5280
AN ACT CONCERNING A NONCHARGE FOR EMPLOYEES PAID
BENEFITS THROUGH THE SHARED WORK PROGRAM DURING
PERIODS OF HIGH UNEMPLOYMENT.